Georgia, session 2025_26, HB89.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
19 SECTION 1.
20 Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the department
21 of public health, is amended by revising subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2A-16, relating
22 to Maternal Mortality Review Committee established, as follows:
23 "(d)(1) Health care providers licensed pursuant to Title 43, health care facilities licensed
24 pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 31, and pharmacies licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 of Title
25 26 shall provide reasonable access to the committee to all relevant medical records
26 associated with a case under review by the committee within 30 days of receiving a
27 request for such records, unless prohibited by state or federal law.
28 (2) A health care provider, health care facility, or pharmacy providing access to medical
29 and psychiatric records pursuant to this Code section shall not be held liable for civil
30 damages or be subject to any criminal or disciplinary action for good faith efforts in
31 providing such records."
32 SECTION 2.
33 Said chapter is further amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
34 "ARTICLE 4
35 31-2A-70.
36 As used in this article, the term:
37 (1) 'Advisory committee' or 'committee' means the Regional Perinatal Center Advisory
38 Committee established pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-71.
39 (2) 'Regional perinatal center' means a specially qualified hospital identified by the
40 department and designated to a specific geographic region to lead collaboration between
H. B. 89 (SUB)
- 2 -

25 LC 57 0207S
41 hospitals and providers to increase the likelihood that deliveries are performed in a
42 hospital with an appropriate level of care for mothers and infants.
43 31-2A-71.
44 (a) There is established the Regional Perinatal Center Advisory Committee for the purpose
45 of considering and making recommendations to the commissioner concerning the addition,
46 reduction, or transition of regional perinatal centers in this state. The committee shall
47 advise the commissioner on the estimated costs to the department necessary to implement
48 such recommendations.
49 (b) The Regional Perinatal Center Advisory Committee shall be composed of not less
50 than 11 nor more than 21 members to be appointed by the commissioner, who shall appoint
51 one of such members to serve as chairperson. All appointments to the committee shall be
52 for a term of four years. A member shall serve until his or her successor has been duly
53 appointed. The commissioner may reappoint any member.
54 (c) The advisory committee shall meet upon the call of the chairperson appointed pursuant
55 to subsection (b) of this Code section.
56 (d) Beginning on July 1, 2026, and every four years thereafter, the department, in
57 conjunction with the advisory committee, shall assess and make recommendations to the
58 commissioner on the adequacy of the regional perinatal system and consider hospital or
59 labor and delivery closures. Such assessment shall evaluate whether:
60 (1) Perinatal facilities in each region are equipped and prepared to stabilize infants and
61 mothers before transport;
62 (2) Coordination exists between maternity care in each region and regional perinatal
63 centers;
64 (3) All identified high-risk pregnancies and deliveries are promptly evaluated in
65 consultation with regional perinatal centers and referred to the appropriate designated
H. B. 89 (SUB)
- 3 -

25 LC 57 0207S
66 regional perinatal center for the proper management and treatment of such conditions as
67 needed;
68 (4) An adequate transport system is available in the region for the transfer of high-risk
69 mothers and infants and specifically considers:
70 (A) The distance and travel time between referring hospitals and regional perinatal
71 centers;
72 (B) The types of vehicles used for transport and whether a need exists for additional
73 vehicles; and
74 (C) The need for upgraded vehicles and transport equipment; and
75 (5) Each regional perinatal center provides:
76 (A) Consultation for patients requiring special services, including transport;
77 (B) Coordination and assurance of follow-up medical care for maternal and neonatal
78 patients requiring special services;
79 (C) Educational support to ensure quality care in institutions involved in perinatal
80 healthcare in the region;
81 (D) An annual education plan with all birthing centers in the region;
82 (E) Compilation and analysis of perinatal data from the center and referring hospitals;
83 and
84 (F) Coordination of perinatal health services within the region.
85 (e) When changes to the regional perinatal centers are approved by the department after
86 recommendation by the advisory committee, the department shall submit a budget request
87 to the Office of Planning and Budget prior to the General Assembly's next legislative
88 session seeking appropriations to implement such changes.
89 31-2A-72.
90 A hospital interested in being designated as a regional perinatal center shall notify the
91 department of the following:
H. B. 89 (SUB)
- 4 -

25 LC 57 0207S
92 (1) Such hospital's ability to meet the standards for regional perinatal centers;
93 (2) Any additional funding necessary to bring such hospital up to standard;
94 (3) Any special planning problems in such hospital's perinatal region, including, but not
95 limited to, transportation, shortage of facilities, and personnel;
96 (4) A description of perinatal care currently being provided;
97 (5) A description of services that can be provided by the center in patient care, education,
98 and consultation to hospitals within the perinatal region; and
99 (6) Any other information requested by the department.
100 31-2A-73.
101 Beginning on July 1, 2026, and every four years thereafter, the department shall present a
102 plan to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President of the
103 Senate for the designated perinatal centers in every region of the state. Such plan shall
104 include funding considerations to aid hospitals in meeting the standards and for continuing
105 requirements, including, but not limited to, patient care, professional education, training
106 programs, and physical facilities.
107 31-2A-74.
108 The department shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
109 purposes of this article."
110 SECTION 3.
111 Code Section 37-3-166 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to treatment of
112 clinical records, when release permitted, scope of privileged communications, liability for
113 disclosure, and notice to sheriff of discharge, is amended by revising subsection (a) as
114 follows:
H. B. 89 (SUB)
- 5 -

25 LC 57 0207S
115 "(a) A clinical record for each patient shall be maintained. Authorized release of the
116 record shall include but not be limited to examination of the original record, copies of all
117 or any portion of the record, or disclosure of information from the record, except for
118 matters privileged under the laws of this state. Such examination shall be conducted on
119 hospital premises at reasonable times determined by the facility. The clinical record shall
120 not be a public record and no part of it shall be released except:
121 (1) When the chief medical officer of the facility where the record is kept deems it
122 essential for continued treatment, a copy of the record or parts thereof may be released
123 to physicians or psychologists when and as necessary for the treatment of the patient;
124 (2) A copy of the record may be released to any person or entity designated in writing
125 by the patient or, if appropriate, the parent of a minor, the legal guardian of an adult or
126 minor, or a person to whom legal custody of a minor patient has been given by order of
127 a court;
128 (2.1) A copy of the record of a deceased patient or deceased former patient may be
129 released to or in response to a valid subpoena of a coroner or medical examiner under
130 Chapter 16 of Title 45, except for matters privileged under the laws of this state;
131 (3) When a patient is admitted to a facility, a copy of the record or information contained
132 in the record from another facility, community mental health center, or private
133 practitioner may be released to the admitting facility. When the service plan of a patient
134 involves transfer of that patient to another facility, community mental health center, or
135 private practitioner, a copy of the record or information contained in the record may be
136 released to that facility, community mental health center, or private practitioner;
137 (4) A copy of the record or any part thereof may be disclosed to any employee or staff
138 member of the facility when it is necessary for the proper treatment of the patient;
139 (5) A copy of the record shall be released to the patient's attorney if the attorney so
140 requests and the patient, or the patient's legal guardian, consents to the release;
H. B. 89 (SUB)
- 6 -

25 LC 57 0207S
141 (6) In a bona fide medical emergency, as determined by a physician treating the patient,
142 the chief medical officer may release a copy of the record to the treating physician or to
143 the patient's psychologist;
144 (7) At the request of the patient, the patient's legal guardian, or the patient's attorney, the
145 record shall be produced by the entity having custody thereof at any hearing held under
146 this chapter;
147 (8) A copy of the record shall be produced in response to a valid subpoena or order of
148 any court of competent jurisdiction, except for matters privileged under the laws of this
149 state;
150 (8.1) A copy of the record may be released to the legal representative of a deceased
151 patient's estate, except for matters privileged under the laws of this state;
152 (9) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a law enforcement officer
153 in the course of a criminal investigation may be informed as to whether a person is or has
154 been a patient in a state facility, as well as the patient's current address, if known; and
155 (10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a law enforcement
156 officer in the course of investigating the commission of a crime on the premises of a
157 facility covered by this chapter or against facility personnel or a threat to commit such
158 a crime may be informed as to the circumstances of the incident, including whether the
159 individual allegedly committing or threatening to commit a crime is or has been a patient
160 in the facility, and the name, address, and last known whereabouts of any alleged patient
161 perpetrator; and
162 (11) A copy of the record of a deceased patient or deceased former patient may be
163 released to the Maternal Mortality Review Committee established under Chapter 2A of
164 Title 31, except for matters privileged under the laws of this state."
H. B. 89 (SUB)
- 7 -

25 LC 57 0207S
165 SECTION 4.
166 Code Section 45-16-24 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to notification
167 of suspicious or unusual deaths, court ordered medical examiner's inquiry, and written report
168 of inquiry, is amended by revising subsection (b) as follows:
169 "(b) A coroner or county medical examiner who is notified of a death pursuant to
170 subsection (a) of this Code section under circumstances specified in paragraphs (1)
171 through (9)(10) of such subsection shall order a medical examiner's inquiry of that death.
172 A coroner or medical examiner who is notified of a death pursuant to subsection (a) of this
173 Code section under circumstances specified in paragraph (10) of such subsection and which
174 death was not under circumstances specified in paragraphs (1) through (9) of such
175 subsection shall order a medical examiner's inquiry for such death through a regional
176 perinatal center, as identified by the Department of Public Health. This subsection shall
177 not be construed to prohibit a medical examiner's inquiry of a death if a coroner or county
178 medical examiner is notified of a death under circumstances specified in paragraph (11) of
179 subsection (a) of this Code section."
180 SECTION 5.
181 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 89 (SUB)
- 8 -